Washington statutes.
RCW 35.97.120

Revenue warrants.

Revenue warrants may be issued and such warrants and interest thereon may be payable out of the special fund or refunded through the proceeds of the sale of refunding revenue warrants or revenue bonds. Every revenue warrant and the interest thereon issued against the special fund is a valid claim of the owner thereof only as against that fund and the amount of revenue pledged to the fund, and does not constitute an indebtedness of the authorized municipality. Every revenue warrant shall state on its face that it is payable from a special fund, naming it and the ordinance or resolution creating it.

[ 1983 c 216 s 12.]